District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.03

District retirement benefits.

The District shall provide retirement benefits to all employees first employed after September 30, 1987, who would otherwise have been covered under the Civil Service Retirement System pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 8331 except those specifically excluded by law or by rule.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2603
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079
Establishment of Pension Benefit Committee: See Mayor’s Order 89-235, October 5, 1989.
1981 Ed., § 1-627.3.
This section is referenced in § 1-529.01, § 1-611.03, § 1-621.03, and § 1-622.04.